Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

General Provisions

6-35-101. Administrative organization.

Within the framework established by this charter, the administrative organization of the city shall be organized into departments of general government, finance, and such other departments necessary to provide health, welfare, police, recreation, fire, library, public works, utilities and other municipal services as shall be provided in a plan of administrative organization to be developed by the city manager and submitted to the council for approval and adoption by ordinance.

The council may by ordinance amend the plan of administrative organization only after receiving the written recommendations of the city manager.

Administrative regulations governing the operations and relationships of departments, agencies, and offices within the administrative organization shall be prepared and issued by the city manager; provided, that the authority to prepare and issue departmental rules and regulations may be delegated to designated subordinates.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.06; T.C.A., § 6-3505.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 63.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-35-102. Disposal of utility plants and property.

The city shall not sell, exchange, lease, or in any way alienate or dispose of the property, easements, or other equipment, privileges or assets that are essential parts of any utility that it may acquire, unless and except the proposition for such purpose shall first have been submitted and approved by a majority vote of the electors voting thereon at a municipal election in the manner provided in this charter.

All contracts, negotiations, licenses, grants, leases, or other forms of transfer in violation of this provision shall be void and of no effect as against the city.

This section shall not, however, be interpreted to preclude the sale, exchange, or other disposal to the advantage of the city, of parts of a utility's property and assets that are not essential to continued effective utility service and the disposal of which will not prejudice municipal interests.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.36; T.C.A., § 6-3536.

Collateral References.

Power of municipality to sell, lease, or mortgage municipal waterworks, gas or electric light plant, or interest therein. 61 A.L.R.2d 595.